Utah statutes.
26-8a-302.   Certification of emergency medical service personnel.

(1)  To promote the availability of comprehensive emergency medical services throughout the state, the committee shall establish:

(a)  initial and ongoing certification and training requirements for emergency medical service personnel in the following categories:

(i)  paramedic;

(ii)  medical director;

(iii)  emergency medical service instructor; and

(iv)  other types of emergency medical personnel as the committee considers necessary; and

(b)  guidelines for giving credit for out-of-state training and experience.

(2)  The department shall, based on the requirements established in Subsection (1):

(a)  develop, conduct, and authorize training and testing for emergency medical service personnel; and

(b)  issue certifications and certification renewals to emergency medical service personnel.

(3)  As provided in Section 26-8a-502, an individual issued a certificate under this section may only provide emergency medical services to the extent allowed by the certificate.

